Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.72.010

Filing proposed measures with secretary of state.

If any legal voter of the state, either individually or on behalf of an organization, desires to petition the legislature to enact a proposed measure, or submit a proposed initiative measure to the people, or order that a referendum of all or part of any act, bill, or law, passed by the legislature be submitted to the people, he or she shall file with the secretary of state:

(1) A legible copy of the measure proposed, or the act or part of such act on which a referendum is desired;

(2) A signed affidavit, or electronic submission, that the sponsor is a registered voter; and

(3) A filing fee prescribed under RCW 43.07.120.

[ 2015 c 72 s 10; 2003 c 111 s 1802; 1982 c 116 s 1; 1965 c 9 s 29.79.010. Prior: 1913 c 138 s 1, part; RRS s 5397, part. Formerly RCW 29.79.010.]